Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.139

County to furnish courthouse.

The county in which the court is held shall furnish the courthouse, a jail or suitable place for confining prisoners, books for record, stationery, lights, wood, attendance, and other incidental expenses of the courthouse and court which are not paid by the United States.

[Code 1881 s 2111; 1869 p 421 s 10; 1863 p 425 s 11; RRS s 4034.]